Utah statutes.
31A-22-1011.   Workers' compensation coverage waivers.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Business entity" means:

(i)  a sole proprietorship;

(ii)  a corporation;

(iii)  a partnership;

(iv)  a limited liability company; or

(v)  an entity similar to one described in Subsections (1)(a)(i) through (iv).

(b)  "Waiver" means a workers' compensation coverage waiver issued under this section.

(2) (a)  Notwithstanding Section 31A-21-104, if the information required by Subsection (3) is provided, an insurer authorized under this title to issue a workers' compensation policy may issue a workers' compensation coverage waiver to a business entity that:

(i)  elects not to include an owner, partner, or corporate officer or director as an employee under a workers' compensation policy in accordance with Section 34A-2-103 and Subsection 34A-2-104(4); and

(ii)  employs no other employee on the day on which the insurer issues the waiver to the business entity.

(b)  As of the day on which a business entity described in Subsection (2)(a) employs an employee other than an owner, partner, or corporate officer or director described in Subsection (2)(a):

(i)  the business entity's waiver is invalid; and

(ii)  the business entity is required to provide workers' compensation coverage for that employee in accordance with Section 34A-2-201.

(3)  To obtain a waiver, a business entity shall submit to the insurer that issues the waiver:

(a)  a copy of two or more of the following:

(i)  the business entity's federal or state income tax return that shows business income for the complete taxable year that immediately precedes the day on which the business entity submits the information;

(ii)  a valid business license;

(iii)  a license to engage in an occupation or profession, including a license under Title 59, Occupations and Professions; or

(iv)  documentation of an active liability insurance policy that covers the business entity's activities; or

(b)  a copy of an item listed in Subsection (3)(a) and a copy of two or more of the following:

(i)  proof of a bank account for the business entity;

(ii)  proof that for the business entity there is:

(A)  a telephone number; and

(B)  a physical location; or

(iii)  an advertisement of services in a newspaper of general circulation or telephone directory showing the business entity's:

(A)  name; and 

(B)  contact information.

(4) (a)  An insurer that issues a waiver shall report to the Labor Commission for each business entity to which the insurer issues a waiver:

(i)  the name, address, and telephone number of the business entity;

(ii)  a name of an individual who can be contacted on behalf of the business entity; and

(iii)  other information required by the Labor Commission, by rule made in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.

(b)  The Labor Commission, by rule made in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, shall determine how frequently an insurer shall make a report required by Subsection (4)(a), except that the Labor Commission shall require that a report be submitted at least monthly.

(5) (a)  The Labor Commission may investigate a business entity to determine whether the business entity validly elects to not cover an owner, partner, or corporate officer or director as an employee under a workers' compensation policy in accordance with Section 34A-2-103.

(b)  If the Labor Commission determines that a business entity's election as provided in this section is invalid, the Labor Commission may:

(i)  prohibit a business entity from using a waiver obtained under this section; and

(ii)  take any action provided for under Title 34A, Chapter 2 or 3 for failure to obtain workers' compensation coverage for an employee.

